District of Columbia statutes.
16-2393

Confidentiality of records.

The provisions of sections 16-2332 and 16-2333 shall apply to all records and files that are created pursuant to proceedings under this subchapter.

Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-273, § 3(b), 48 DCR 1637
This section is referenced in § 16-2394.
For temporary (225 day) addition of subchapter V, “Permanent Guardianship”, consisting of §§ 16-2381 to 16-2399, see § 3(b) of the Adoption and Guardianship Subsidy Temporary Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Law 18-208, July 27, 2010, law notification 57 DCR 7547).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of the Foster Children’s Guardianship Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-490, December 18, 2000, 48 DCR 63).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3(c) of Foster Children’s Guardianship Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-4, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2254).